District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.14

Coordination of procurement and use.

Each hospital in the District of Columbia shall enter into agreements or affiliations with procurement organizations for coordination of procurement and use of anatomical gifts.

History

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 15, 55 DCR 2532

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 15 of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (2006).